Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Sec. 1. new text begin [290.0687] AEROSPACE AND AVIATION CREDIT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. new text end new text begin (b) "Aerospace" means relating to vehicles or objects for the purpose of suborbital, orbital, or space flight, whether for private or public, or civil or defense-related purposes. new text end new text begin (c) "Aviation" means relating to vehicles or objects, except parachutes, for the purpose of controlled flight through the air, regardless of how propelled or controlled, whether manned or unmanned, whether for private or public, or civil or defense-related purposes, or whether equipped with parachute systems. new text end new text begin (d) "Aviation and aerospace sector" means a private or public organization engaged in the manufacture of aviation or aerospace hardware or software, aviation or aerospace maintenance, aviation or aerospace repair and overhaul, supply of parts to the aviation or aerospace industry, provision of services and support relating to the aviation or aerospace industry, research and development of aviation or aerospace technology and systems, or the education and training of aviation or aerospace personnel. new text end new text begin (e) "Compensation" means payments for performance of services for which the payor is required to provide a return pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code, section 6041, or a statement pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code, section 6051, to the person paid. Compensation includes wages, salary, or other remuneration, paid to a qualified employee. Compensation does not include employer-provided retirement, medical or health care benefits, or reimbursement for travel, meals, lodging, or any other expense. new text end new text begin (f) "Eligible institution" means any postsecondary institution that participates in the federal Pell Grant Program under Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, Public Law 89-329, as amended. new text end new text begin (g) "Full-time basis" means at least 40 hours per week. new text end new text begin (h) "Qualified employee" means any person who meets the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) was newly employed by a qualified employer on a full-time basis, or first contracted with a qualified employer on a full-time basis, on or after January 1, 2026; and new text end new text begin (2) has been awarded, within one year before or after the beginning date of employment, an undergraduate degree, graduate degree, technical degree, or certificate in a qualified program by an qualified institution. new text end new text begin (i) "Qualified employer" means a sole proprietorship, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, corporation, other legally recognized business entity, or public entity whose principal business activity involves the aviation and aerospace sector and who employs a qualified employee. new text end new text begin (j) "Qualified program" means a program at an eligible institution that: new text end new text begin (1) has been accredited by the Engineering Accreditation Commission of the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology, the Federal Aviation Administration, or a regional accrediting body and that awards an undergraduate or graduate degree; new text end new text begin (2) is within the meaning of an associate of applied science degree program or career technical education program that results in the awarding of a degree or certificate that prepares the graduate for gainful employment with a qualified employer; or new text end new text begin (3) results in obtaining a certification or rating which directly relates to the aviation and aerospace sector and is granted through the Federal Aviation Administration or regional accredited body. new text end new text begin (k) "Tuition" means the amount paid for enrollment, program-specific course fees, and instruction in a qualified program that includes both amounts paid during participation in a qualified program and amounts paid for tuition debt upon completion of a qualified program. Tuition does not include the cost of books, fees that are not program-specific course fees, or room and board. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Credit for qualified employees; carryover. new text end new text begin (a) A qualified employee is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this chapter in an amount equal to $5,000 each year in the first through fifth consecutive years of employment with a qualified employer. A qualified employee may claim the credit for the taxable year in which the qualified employee first became eligible for the credit under this section and for each of the four taxable years following the taxable year in which the credit was first allowed. The credit each year is limited to the qualified employee's liability for tax. new text end new text begin (b) If the amount of the credit under this subdivision for any taxable year exceeds the limitations under paragraph (a), the excess is a credit carryover to each of the four succeeding taxable years. The entire amount of the excess unused credit for the taxable year must be carried first to the earliest of the taxable years to which the credit may be carried. The amount of the unused credit that may be added under this paragraph may not exceed the qualified employee's liability for tax, less the credit for the taxable year. The credit may not be carried over to any taxable year after the fourth taxable year following the taxable year in which the credit was first allowed. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Credit for tuition paid by qualified employers; limitation. new text end new text begin (a) A qualified employer is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this chapter for tuition reimbursed each year to a qualified employee in the first through fifth consecutive years of employment. new text end new text begin (b) The credit equals 50 percent of the amount of tuition reimbursed by the qualified employer to each qualified employee except that the credit must not exceed 50 percent of the average annual amount paid by a qualified employee for enrollment and instruction in a qualified program. The credit is limited to the qualified employer's liability for tax. The credit is not refundable and may not be carried forward. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Credit for compensation paid by qualified employers; limitation. new text end new text begin (a) A qualified employer is allowed a credit against the tax for compensation paid during the taxable year to a qualified employee. The credit is allowed in the first through fifth consecutive years of employment. No credit may be claimed for compensation paid to a qualified employee after the fifth year of employment of the qualified employee. new text end new text begin (b) The credit equals ten percent of the compensation paid to a qualified employee each year. The credit must not exceed $15,000 each year for each qualified employee. The credit is limited to the qualified employer's liability for tax. The credit is not refundable and may not be carried forward. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Qualified employer credits; pass through entities. new text end new text begin Credits under subdivisions 3 and 4 allowed to a partnership, a limited liability company taxed as a partnership, an S corporation, or multiple owners of property are passed through to the partners, members, shareholders, or owners, respectively, pro rata to each based on the partner's, member's, shareholder's, or owner's share of the entity's assets or as specially allocated in the organizational documents or any other executed agreement, as of the last day of the taxable year. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin Beginning January 15, 2028, and each year thereafter, the commissioner must submit a written report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over taxes, in compliance with sections 3.195 and 3.197, on the tax credits issued under this section. The report must include information regarding the cost and effectiveness of the tax credit program. The report may also include any recommendations for changes to law necessary to implement the credit. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin No new credits may be earned for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2030. Credits allowed under this section may be claimed for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2035. This section expires January 1, 2035, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2034. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end